Oklahoma, session 2026, SB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10-9.4a of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry shall declare and


establish a moratorium on the registration of any new poultry


feeding operations.


B. The provisions of this section shall not apply to existing


poultry feeding operations; provided, however, the Department shall


be authorized to review, inspect, or investigate existing poultry

Req. No. 185 Page 1


feeding operations, and, if such review, inspection, or


investigation results in a penalty pursuant to Section 10-9.11 of


Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the Department shall cease


registration of the violating poultry feeding operation. The


Department shall not reissue a certification for any operation whose


certification was revoked pursuant to this subsection.


C. The Department shall promulgate any rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20-44a of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry shall declare and


establish a moratorium on new concentrated animal feeding operations


licenses for persons engaging in poultry feeding operations for


which registration is not required pursuant to subsection B of


Section 10-9.3 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The provisions of this section shall not apply to existing


concentrated animal feeding operations licenses for persons engaging


in poultry feeding operations; provided, however, the Department


shall be authorized to review, inspect, or investigate existing


concentrated animal feeding operations for persons engaging in


poultry feeding operations, and, if such review, inspection, or


investigation violates the provisions of Section 20-61 of Title 2 of

Req. No. 185 Page 2


the Oklahoma Statutes, the Department shall revoke the license of


such individuals engaging in the poultry feeding operation. The


Department shall not reissue a license for any operation whose


license was revoked pursuant to this subsection.


C. The Department shall promulgate any rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-185 MR 12/27/2024 1:56:20 PM































Req. No. 185 Page 3